Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Chapter 1. General Provisions
§ 5.
Repealed. 2003, No. 61, § 4.

§ 6.
Vehicle registration renewal by municipal clerks.

By written agreement, the Commissioner may authorize any municipal clerk to renew vehicle, snowmobile, or motorboat registrations upon receipt of a completed application and the required fees which shall be forwarded to the Commissioner immediately. A clerk may assess, collect, and retain an additional $3.00 administration fee for each renewal issued.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 25, 1996; amended

1997, No. 55

, § 2, eff. June 26, 1997;

2001, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 2a, eff. May 15, 2002.

§ 7.
Enhanced driver’s license; maintenance of database information; fee.

The face of an enhanced license shall contain the individual’s name, date of birth, gender, a unique identification number, full facial photograph or imaged likeness, address, signature, issuance and expiration dates, citizenship, and, if applicable, a veteran designation. The back of the enhanced license shall have a machine-readable zone. A Gen 2 vicinity Radio Frequency Identification chip shall be embedded in the enhanced license in compliance with the security standards of the U.S. Department of Homeland Security. Any additional personal identity information not currently required by the Department of Homeland Security shall need the approval of either the General Assembly or the Legislative Committee on Administrative Rules prior to the implementation of the requirements.

In addition to any other requirement of law or rule, before an enhanced license may be issued to a person, the person shall present for inspection and copying satisfactory documentary evidence to determine identity and U.S. citizenship. An application shall be accompanied by: a photo identity document, documentation showing the person’s date and place of birth, proof of the person’s Social Security number, and documentation showing the person’s principal residence address. New and renewal application forms shall include a space for the applicant to request that a “veteran” designation be placed on the enhanced license. If a veteran, as defined in 38 U.S.C. § 101(2), requests a veteran designation and provides a Department of Defense Form 214 or other proof of veteran status specified by the Commissioner, and the Office of Veterans Affairs confirms his or her status as an honorably discharged veteran or a veteran discharged under honorable conditions, the identification card shall include the term “veteran” on its face. To be issued, an enhanced license must meet the same requirements as those for the issuance of a U.S. passport. Before an application may be processed, the documents and information shall be verified as determined by the Commissioner. Any additional personal identity information not currently required by the U.S. Department of Homeland Security shall need the approval of either the General Assembly or the Legislative Committee on Administrative Rules prior to the implementation of the requirements.

No person shall compile or maintain a database of electronically readable information derived from an operator’s license, junior operator’s license, enhanced license, learner permit, or nondriver identification card. This prohibition shall not apply to a person who accesses, uses, compiles, or maintains a database of the information for law enforcement or governmental purposes or for the prevention of fraud or abuse or other criminal conduct.

The fee for an enhanced license shall be $30.00 in addition to the fees otherwise established by this title.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 39; amended

2007, No. 188

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2013, No. 57

, § 16;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 8.
Personal radio frequency identification chip number protection.

Personal radio frequency identification chip numbers shall be given protections as codified in the Driver’s Privacy Protection Act, 18 U.S.C. chapter 123, as of January 1, 2008, not including any subsequent amendments.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 188

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 134.